Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW to read as follows:(1) Fire districts and insurance providers should collaborate to develop incentives that promote wildfire mitigation best practices related to agricultural activities. Any incentive developed through such collaboration should be optional for insurance providers to offer and voluntary for policyholders to accept.(2) Incentives may relate to best practices for either holders of crop insurance or fire insurance, or both. Best practices may include, but are not limited to:(a) Installation and maintenance of defensible space or fire breaks;(b) Proper equipment storage;(c) Installation and maintenance of water tanks;(d) Ownership of equipment related to wildfire mitigation including, but not limited to, a firefighting apparatus, tractor, or disc harrow; and(e) Notification for local red flag warnings.--- END ---